Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-924
Repurchase
relinquished creditable service; credit for prior years of service;
payment; rules and regulations; election; provisions applicable.

The retirement board shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to allow for lump-sum or installment payments for school employees
who elect to repurchase relinquished
creditable service under section 79-921 or buy credit for prior
years of service under sections 79-933.03
to 79-933.06 and
79-933.08. Any person who elects to repurchase
relinquished creditable service or buy credit for prior years
of service on an installment basis may be charged reasonable service costs,
shall be credited with those prior years of service only as the money is actually
received by the retirement system, and shall have paid to the retirement system
all installments prior to the commencement of a retirement annuity.

Laws 1986, LB 325, § 6;

Laws 1990, LB 819, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1514.05;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 559;

Laws 1996, LB 1076, § 18;

Laws 1997, LB 724, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB1042, § 3.